Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2101
Garbage disposal plants, systems and solid waste disposal areas; construction and maintenance; acquisition; eminent domain.

Cities of the first class, cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to purchase, construct, maintain and improve garbage disposal plants, systems or solid waste disposal areas, and purchase equipment for the operation thereof, for the use of their respective municipalities and the inhabitants thereof, and are hereby authorized and empowered to lease or to take land in fee within their corporate limits or without their corporate limits by donation, gift, devise, purchase or appropriation for rights-of-way and for construction and operation of such a disposal plant, system or solid waste disposal area.

Laws 1947, c. 54, § 1, p. 183;

Laws 1961, c. 60, § 1, p. 219;

Laws 1969, c. 117, § 1, p. 533.